Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.343

General obligation bond retirement fund—Warrants to be paid from general fund.

From and after the first day of May, 1955, all warrants drawn on the general obligation bond retirement fund and not presented for payment shall be paid from the general fund, and it shall be the duty of the state treasurer and he or she is hereby directed to pay such warrants when presented from the general fund.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5154; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.343. Prior: 1955 c 330 s 4.]